Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1909
Radiation, defined.

Radiation means ionizing radiation and nonionizing radiation as follows:

(1) Ionizing radiation means gamma rays, X-rays, alpha and beta particles, high-speed electrons, neutrons, protons, and other atomic or nuclear particles or rays but does not include sound or radio waves or visible, infrared, or ultraviolet light; and

(2) Nonionizing radiation means (a) any electromagnetic radiation which can be generated during the operation of electronic products as defined in section 71-3503 to such energy density levels as to present a biological hazard to occupational and public health and safety and the environment, other than ionizing electromagnetic radiation, and (b) any sonic, ultrasonic, or infrasonic waves which are emitted from an electronic product as defined in section 71-3503 as a result of the operation of an electronic circuit in such product and to such energy density levels as to present a biological hazard to occupational and public health and safety and the environment.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 647.